zh-CN: 巴松管喇叭口材质: 复合材料; 金属; 木制; 带有金属内衬的木制材料; 其他
de: Material des Fagott-Kopfstücks: Verbundstoff; Metall; Holz; Holz mit Metallauskleidung; Sonstige
pt-BR: Material da campana do fagote: Composto; Metal; Madeira; Madeira com revestimento de metal; Outros
nb: Materiale for fagottklokke: Kompositt; Metall; Tre; Tre med metallforing; Annet
el: Υλικό καμπάνας φαγκότου: Σύνθετο υλικό; Μέταλλο; Ξύλο; Ξύλο με μεταλλική επένδυση; Άλλο
bg-BG: Материал на камбаната на фагота: Композитен материал; Метал; Дърво; Дърво с метална облицовка; Друго
th: วัสดุเบลของบาสซูน: คอมโพสิต; โลหะ; ไม้; ไม้บุด้วยโลหะ; อื่นๆ
fr: Matériau du pavillon de basson: Composite; Métal; Bois; Bois avec doublure en métal; Autre
hr-HR: Materijal zvona fagota: Kompozit; Metal; Drvo; Drvo s metalnom postavom; Ostalo
hu: Fagott harang anyaga: Kompozit; Fém; Fa; Fém bélésű fa; Egyéb
pl: Materiał czary fagotu: Kompozyt; Metal; Drewno; Drewno z metalowym wnętrzem; Inny
tr: Fagot çan malzemesi: Kompozit; Metal; Ahşap; Metal astarlı ahşap; Diğer
en: Bassoon bell material: Composite; Metal; Wood; Wood with metal lining; Other
zh-TW: 低音管揚音管材質: 複合材料; 金屬; 木材; 木製加金屬內襯; 其他
ro-RO: Materialul clopotului fagot: Compozit; Metal; Lemn; Lemn cu căptușeală metalică; Altele
pt-PT: Material da campânula do fagote: Composto; Metal; Madeira; Madeira com revestimento em metal; Outro
it: Materiale per campana di fagotto: Composito; Metallo; Legno; Legno con rivestimento in metallo; Altro
sk-SK: Materiál zvončeka fagotu: Kompozit; Kov; Drevo; Drevo s kovovou vložkou; Iný
da: Materiale i fagottens klangstykke: Komposit; Metal; Træ; Træ med metalforing; Andet
vi: Vật liệu loa kèn bassoon: Composite; Kim loại; Gỗ; Gỗ lót kim loại; Khác
nl: Fagot beker materiaal: Composiet; Metaal; Hout; Hout met metalen voering; Overig
cs: Materiál ozvučníku fagotu: Kompozit; Kov; Dřevo; Dřevo s kovovou vložkou; Jiné
sv: Material för fagottklocka: Komposit; Metall; Trä; Trä med metallfoder; Övrigt
lt-LT: Fagoto varpo medžiaga: Kompozitas; Metalas; Mediena; Mediena su metaliniu pamušalu; Kita
es: Material de la campana del fagot: Compuesto; Metal; Madera; Madera con revestimiento metálico; Otro
sl-SI: Material obročka za fagot: Kompozit; Kovina; Les; Les s kovinsko oblogo; Drugo
fi: Fagotin kellon materiaali: Komposiitti; Metalli; Puu; Puu metallivuorauksella; Muu
ko: 바순 벨 재질: 복합재; 금속; 목재; 금속 안감을 덧댄 목재; 기타
ja: ファゴットのベルの素材: コンポジット; 金属; 木製; 金属ライニング付き木製; その他
ru: Материал раструба фагота: Композит; Металл; Дерево; Дерево с металлической отделкой; Другое